Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 3

Food Assistance

71-5-301. Short title.

This part may be cited as and shall be known as the “Food Stamp Act of 1971.”

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2201, 14-27-101.

71-5-302. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to provide for improved levels of nutrition among economically needy households through a cooperative federal-state program of food assistance to be operated in such counties of this state as may be certified by the department of human services and designated by the secretary of the United States department of agriculture, or its successor agency, to participate in the food stamp program in accordance with the requirements of Public Law 88-525 (7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.), and any amendments to that law or any other subsequently enacted federal statutes on the same subject.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-2202, 14-27-102.

71-5-303. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Applicant” means any person who has applied for benefits under this part;

“Area manager” means the director or manager of the county or area office of the department of human services;

“Assistance” or “food assistance” means food stamp coupons, free food stamps or food purchase assistance that is issued or transferred by means of food coupons, food stamps, electronic benefits transfer processes or other means as determined by the department to an eligible household or low-income family pursuant to this part;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services;

“County office” means the county office of the department of human services in the county where the applicant or recipient resides and in which county a food stamp program is currently in operation;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Food coupons” or “food stamps” means obligations of the United States government issued or transferred by means of food coupons or food stamps to enable the purchase of food for the eligible household;

“Food stamp program or programs” includes the program that enables persons determined eligible for the provision of assistance by the governments of the United States or the state of Tennessee pursuant to this part, to purchase foodstuffs and includes food coupons, food stamps, electronic benefits transfer processes or other means as may be approved for this purpose by the department;

The commissioner of human services shall have authority to establish a system for distribution of any benefits provided by this part by means of an electronic benefits transfer system or by such other means as the commissioner shall determine is appropriate;

“Recipient” means any person who has been determined to be eligible to receive benefits under this part and who has received such benefits; and

“Resident,” for the purpose of this part, means any individual who is living within a county in this state in which a food stamp program is in operation, with the intent that such individual's permanent home be within the county, and not temporarily. The department shall adopt rules and regulations under which it shall make this determination; provided, that temporary absences from the state or county shall not cause a person to lose residential status.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 3; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, §§ 1 (a, b), 2 (a, b); T.C.A., §§ 14-2203; 14-27-103; Acts 1996, ch. 950, §§ 12, 14.

71-5-304. Duties of department.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of the food stamp or food assistance program in this state for eligible recipients;

Make uniform rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for carrying out and enforcing this part in an efficient, economical and impartial manner, to the end that the food stamp or food assistance program may be administered uniformly in all counties of this state that have been designated by the United States secretary of agriculture to participate in the food stamp or food assistance program and in which counties a food stamp or food assistance program is currently in operation;

Establish state-wide standards for determining the amount of food stamp assistance or food assistance any person, household or family shall receive under this part;

Cooperate with the secretary of the United States department of agriculture, or any federal officer or agency made successor to the department of agriculture, in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for food stamp assistance or food assistance in conformity with this part, including the making of such reports in such form and containing such information as the secretary of agriculture, or any federal officer or agency made successor to the department of agriculture, may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as such secretary may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Establish and enforce safeguards to prevent unauthorized disclosures or improper use of information contained in applications, reports of investigations, and correspondence in the individual case records of recipients of food coupons, food stamps or food assistance transferred electronically or by other means; and

Adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of a sliding scale of benefit reduction for individuals receiving food coupons, food stamps or food assistance transferred electronically or by other means for six (6) months or longer in which benefits do not abruptly terminate when a recipient earns above a certain maximum amount, but instead, such benefits gradually lessen in increments of twenty-five percent (25%) of the individual's total benefit every three (3) months; provided, that no rules and regulations shall conflict with federal legislation or provide benefits exceeding federal maximum income guidelines, and no such rules and regulations shall be promulgated that shall cause a decrease or suspension of federal funding. This subdivision (6) shall take effect only to the extent that such provisions are consistent with federal laws and regulations governing the temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) and food stamp or food assistance programs and only to the extent federal financial participation under such programs is available therefor.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 4; T.C.A., § 14-2204; Acts 1985, ch. 313, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., §14-27-104; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 15; 1999, ch. 248, §§ 2-4; 1999, ch. 520, § 47; 2017, ch. 461, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Former references to “aid to families with dependent children (AFDC)” were deleted as obsolete by the code commission and were changed to “temporary assistance for needy families (TANF)” in 2004.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-5-305. Eligibility requirements for assistance.

Assistance under this part shall be granted to any needy person, household or low-income family that meets the requirements set forth in federal statutes and such standards of need as may be established by the department or required by any subsequently enacted federal statute on the same subject.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2205, 14-27-105.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-306. Determination of amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance to which any person, household or family shall be entitled to receive in the form of food coupons, food stamps or food purchase benefits transferred electronically or by other means under this part shall be determined by measuring the income and resources of such person, household or family against the state-wide standards provided in §71-5-304(3) and shall be approved by the area manager or the area manager's designated agent in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the department. Any amount of earned income required by federal statute to be exempt in determining need shall be exempt and shall not be considered as a resource in determining the amount of assistance to be paid to any person under this part.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 6; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2206, 14-27-106; Acts 1996, ch. 950, §§ 13, 16.

71-5-307. Method of applying for assistance.

An applicant for assistance under this part, or a person acting in an applicant's behalf, shall file the application in the county office in the county wherein the applicant resides and in which county a food stamp program is currently in operation, in such manner and form as shall be prescribed by the department.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 14-2207, 14-27-107.

71-5-308. Investigation of applications — Determination of eligibility.

When an application for food stamp assistance is filed with the county office, the area manager, or a designated agent, shall promptly make or cause to be made such investigation as it may deem necessary. The object of such investigation shall be to ascertain facts supporting the application and such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the department. Upon the completion of such investigation, the area manager or the area manager's designated agent shall, within a reasonable period of time, determine eligibility.

Pursuant to the option granted the state by 21 U.S.C. § 862a(d), an individual convicted under federal or state law of a felony involving possession, use or distribution of a controlled substance shall be exempt from the prohibition contained in 21 U.S.C. § 862a(a) against eligibility for food stamp program benefits for such convictions, if such person, as determined by the department:

Is currently participating in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services;

Is currently enrolled in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services, but is subject to a waiting list to receive available treatment, and the individual remains enrolled in the treatment program and enters the treatment program at the first available opportunity;

Has satisfactorily completed a substance abuse treatment program approved by the department of human services; or

Is determined by a treatment provider licensed by the department of health, division of alcohol and drug abuse services, not to need substance abuse treatment according to TennCare guidelines; and

Is complying with, or has already complied with, all obligations imposed by the criminal court, including any substance abuse treatment obligations.

Eligibility based upon the factors in subdivision (b)(1) must be based upon documentary or other evidence satisfactory to the department, and the applicant must meet all other factors for program eligibility.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(1)(B) to the contrary, no person convicted of a Class A felony for violating a provision of title 39, chapter 17, part 4 shall be eligible for the exemptions provided by this subsection (b).

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 8; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2208, 14-27-108; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 13; 2002, ch. 715, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A felony, §40-35-111.

71-5-309. Appeal of determination of area manager.

If an application is not acted upon by the area manager or the area manager's designated agent within a reasonable time after the filing of the application, or is denied in whole or in part, or if an award of food stamp assistance is modified or cancelled under any provisions of this part, the applicant or recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by the department, and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the department. Written notice of a right to a fair hearing shall be given to each applicant and recipient at such time as any action concerning the amount of benefits awarded to the individual is taken or at the time a decision is made on an applicant's eligibility for such assistance.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 9; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2209, 14-27-109; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 13.

71-5-310. Review of determinations of area managers.

The department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of an area manager or an area manager's designated agent and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the area manager or the area manager's designated agent within a reasonable time. The department may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary, and shall make such decision on such application as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with this part. Applicants or recipients affected by such decisions of the department shall be notified of such decision in writing, and shall, upon request, be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the department. All decisions of the department shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the area manager or the area manager's designated agent.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 10; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2210, 14-27-110; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 13.

71-5-311. Election of county to participate.

Any county may elect to participate in the food stamp program by the adoption of a resolution by the county legislative body of the county, requesting certification by the department to the United States department of agriculture, or a successor agency, as to the county's eligibility to so participate in the program.

Any county electing to participate in the program will be bound by all provisions of this part and the regulations issued pursuant to this part for so long as a food stamp program is in operation in the county.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 11; 1973, ch. 303, § 29; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §§ 14-2211, 14-27-111.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-312. Administration costs.

Cost of the administration of the food stamp program shall consist of a contribution from the federal government in an amount as provided by congress, and a contribution from the state amounting to one hundred percent (100%) of the administrative expenditures not provided through federal funds.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 13; 1973, ch. 303, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-2213, 14-27-112.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

71-5-313. Receipt or transfer of property by recipient — Notice required — Recovery of excess payments.

If at any time during the certification for food stamp assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of any property, real or personal, or income in excess of the amount stated in the recipient's application for such assistance or transfers any of the recipient's property, real or personal, it shall be the duty of the recipient to immediately notify the area manager of the local county office of the department of the transfer, receipt or possession of such property or income. Any food stamp assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of property, real or personal, or income, or, if it is determined that a recipient possessed property or income in an amount greater than that stated in the recipient's application, or has transferred any of the recipient's property, real or personal, that renders the recipient ineligible to receive such assistance under the rules and regulations of the department, the full amount of such assistance shall be recoverable in a suit by the state as a debt due the state.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 18; 1973, ch. 337, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 14-2218, 14-27-113; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 13.

71-5-314. Fraudulent receipt of food assistance — Penalties — Statute of limitations.

A person commits an offense who, knowingly, obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any person to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement, representation, or impersonation, or by any other fraudulent means or in any manner not authorized by this part, or by the regulations or procedures issued or implemented by the department pursuant to this part, any food coupons, food stamps, or food assistance benefits provided by any electronic benefits transfer process, or any assistance provided pursuant to this part by any other means as determined by the department, to which such person is not entitled or of a greater value than that to which such person is entitled.

A person commits an offense who, knowingly, in any manner not authorized by this part or the regulations or procedures implemented by the department pursuant to this part, presents for payment, or causes to be presented for payment, transfers, exchanges, sells, or otherwise uses, or aids or abets any person to present for payment, transfer, exchange, sell, or otherwise use any food coupons, food stamps or food assistance benefits, or any electronic benefits card, authorization or personal identification number, device or other thing or means issued or utilized for the purpose of providing temporary assistance benefits pursuant to this part electronically or otherwise.

A person who receives food coupons, food stamps or food assistance benefits or any electronic benefits card, authorization or personal identification number, device or other thing or means issued or utilized for the purpose of providing food assistance benefits electronically or otherwise, knowing them to have been presented for payment, transferred, exchanged, sold or otherwise used in any manner not authorized by this part or the regulations or procedures implemented by the department pursuant to this part, commits an offense.

An offense under this section is a Class E felony if the value of such food stamps, food coupons, or food assistance sought to be obtained, or that is obtained, is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, and upon conviction of the offense, such person shall be sentenced for such offense as provided by law, or shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both; and, if the food stamps, food coupons, or food assistance sought to be obtained, or that is obtained, is of a value less than one hundred dollars ($100), such person commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced or fined, or both, as provided by law.

In addition to or in lieu of any of the penalties in this section, the court may order that such person be disqualified from participation in the food coupon, food stamp or food assistance program for twelve (12) months for the first offense, twenty-four (24) months for the second offense, and permanently for the third offense. Disqualification pursuant to this section of any adult from eligibility for assistance under this part shall not operate to disqualify or suspend the eligibility of an innocent adult or child of the disqualified person's family.

The department shall enclose a copy of the penalties provided in this section one (1) time, in notice form, to each recipient of assistance pursuant to this part and post a notice to such effect in noticeable places in each of its assistance offices.

In addition to any of the penalties in this section, any person convicted of any offense specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) shall be ordered to make restitution in the total amount found to be the value of the food coupons, food stamps or food assistance that form the basis for the conviction. In the event any person ordered to make restitution pursuant to this section is found to be indigent and, therefore, unable to make restitution in full at the time of conviction, the court shall order a periodic payment plan consistent with the person's financial ability.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, prosecutions for any of the offenses specified in subsection (a), (b) or (c) shall be commenced within four (4) years after the commission of the offense. For purposes of this subsection (h), any such offense that is based upon a willful failure to report information as required by law is considered a continuing offense until such information is reported.

In addition to any criminal provisions provided by this section, the department is authorized to address intentional program violations or overpayments in the food assistance program through any administrative means, including, but not limited to, settlement of such violations or overpayments by a written agreement with recipients or by the provision of administrative hearings pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, and federal regulations.

The department is authorized to initiate legal action to collect all overpayments and all payments made due to intentional program violations or fraud in the food assistance program.

The department shall implement the following procedures regarding electronic benefits card replacement requests:

The department shall, upon the third request within a twelve-month period, notify the recipient to provide information regarding fraud, abuse, and trafficking and inform the recipient of the consequences that result from a fourth request within a twelve-month period, as provided in subdivision (j)(2);

The department shall, upon the fourth replacement request within a twelve-month period, notify the recipient that the recipient's case is being monitored for suspicious activity and has been referred to the department's office of inspector general for investigation; and

If a third-party vendor provides replacement cards directly to recipients on behalf of the department, the vendor shall notify the department upon a third request within a twelve-month period by a recipient and upon any subsequent request thereafter.

Acts 1971, ch. 136, § 19; T.C.A., § 14-2219; Acts 1980, ch. 572, § 3; 1981, ch. 390, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 647, § 1; 1985, ch. 34, § 1; T.C.A., §14-27-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 108-111; 1999, ch. 248, § 5; 2013, ch. 402, § 2; 2018, ch. 789, § 5.

Cross-References. Fraudulent receipt of temporary assistance, penalties and statute of limitations, §71-3-120.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

71-5-315. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.

71-5-316. Data matches.

On at least a quarterly basis, the department of human services shall conduct data matches against information databases as required by federal law, including the following:

Earned and unearned income information maintained by the federal internal revenue service;

Employer reports of income and unemployment insurance payment information maintained by the federal department of labor;

Earned income information maintained by the federal social security administration;

Death register information maintained by the federal social security administration;

Prisoner information maintained by the federal social security administration;

Beneficiary records and earnings information maintained by the federal social security administration;

Employment information maintained by the Tennessee department of labor and workforce development;

Employment information regarding new hires maintained by the federal department of health and human services;

Supplemental security income information maintained by the federal social security administration; and

Veterans' benefits information maintained by the federal department of health and human services, in coordination with the Tennessee department of health and Tennessee department of veterans services.

The department of human services shall, upon approval from the secretary of the United States department of agriculture, take any steps necessary to enter into an intra-agency agreement joining a multi-state cooperative that identifies individuals who are currently receiving benefits in other surrounding states to minimize dual participation.

Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 3; 2018, ch. 789, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Program lntegrity Act of 2017.”